Maine, session 132, LD145.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Office of Aging and Disability Services Central Office 0140
Initiative: Provides one-time funding in the Office of Aging and Disability Services Central
Office program to support the delivery of long-term care ombudsman services in Aroostook
County.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $107,425
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $107,425
Page 1 - 132LR0538(06)